Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 8.1
INDEPENDENT LIVING SERVICES

26-8.1-101 to 26-8.1-108. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire article repealed, (SB 16-093), ch. 54, p. 132, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1981. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2016, consult the 2015 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. This article was relocated to article 85 title 8. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.